Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1705.   Factual determination of procurement appeals panel final and conclusive.

A determination of an issue of fact by a procurement appeals panel may not be overturned on appeal, unless the determination is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.



Amended by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

